Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2860XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 451 Section 1. Section 100.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 100.2 Duties of fire officials. 3 1. The chief of the fire department or the chiefâs designee 4 of every city or township in which a fire department is 5 established or the chief of the fire department or the chiefâs 6 designee responding to every township fire where there is a 7 contract for fire protection in effect shall investigate into 8 the cause, origin and circumstances of every fire occurring 9 in the city or township by which property has been destroyed 10 or damaged or which results in bodily injury to a person, and 11 determine whether the fire was the result of natural causes, 12 negligence or design resulting in property damage, bodily 13 injury, or destruction. The investigation shall determine 14 whether the fire was caused by natural factors, negligence, or 15 intentional action . 16 2. The department of transportation shall provide 17 registration information to the chief of the fire department or 18 the chiefâs designee in the course of a required investigation 19 under this section if the fire official is a law enforcement 20 officer certified by the Iowa law enforcement academy. 21 3. All law enforcement agencies within the state are 22 required to authorize access to the national crime information 23 center database to the chief of the fire department or the 24 chiefâs designee in the course of a required investigation 25 under this section if the fire official is a law enforcement 26 officer certified by the Iowa law enforcement academy. 27 4. The state fire marshal may assist in the investigation 28 or may direct the investigation if the fire marshal finds it 29 necessary. 30 Sec. 2. Section 100.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 100.3 Reports of fires and emergency responses. 33 When death, serious bodily injury, or property damage in 34 excess of two hundred thousand dollars has occurred as a 35 -1- LSB 2860XS (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. 451 result of a fire, or if arson is suspected, the fire official 1 required by section 100.2 to make fire investigations , shall 2 notify the state fire marshalâs division immediately. For 3 all other fires causing an estimated damage of fifty dollars 4 or more or emergency responses by the fire service, the fire 5 official required by section 100.2 to investigate shall file 6 a report with the fire marshalâs division within ten seven 7 days following the end of the month regardless of whether the 8 division participated in or supervised the investigation . Upon 9 written request, an extension of up to fourteen days may be 10 granted for compelling reasons. The report shall indicate 11 all fire incidents occurring which that have an estimated 12 damage of fifty dollars or more and state for each incident the 13 name of the owners and occupants of the property at the time 14 of the fire, the value of the property, the estimated total 15 loss to the property, the origin of the fire as determined by 16 investigation, and other facts, statistics, and circumstances 17 concerning the fire incident. The report on each emergency 18 response shall include the nature of the incident and other 19 facts, statistics and circumstances concerning the emergency 20 response. 21